Indiana, session 2026, HB1427.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-1-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 23. Reporting on Gender Transition Procedures
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 25-1-22 apply to this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "practitioner" has the meaning
set forth in IC 25-1-9-2.
Sec. 3. (a) A practitioner who performs any gender transition
procedure (as defined in IC 25-1-22-5) shall report the
performance of the procedures on a quarterly basis to the
practitioner's regulating board.
(b) The report by the practitioner under subsection (a) must
include the following:
(1) The county in which each gender transition procedure was
performed.
(2) The type of gender transition procedure performed.
(c) Each board that receives a report under this section shall
2026 IN 1427—LS 6909/DI 104


compile the reports on a quarterly basis not later than five (5)
business days after the receipt of the quarterly reports from the
practitioners and submit the summarized report to the professional
licensing agency.
(d) Not later than March 1 of each year, the professional
licensing agency shall compile each report from a regulating board
under subsection (c) into an annual report for the preceding
calendar year. The report shall be sorted by county and by gender
transition procedure.
(e) A report under this section may not provide personally
identifying information concerning a patient.
Sec. 4. The professional licensing agency shall do the following
concerning the annual report under section 3(d) of this chapter:
(1) Submit the annual report to the general assembly in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(2) Post the annual report on the professional licensing
agency's website.
2026 IN 1427—LS 6909/DI 104